translate/sgh_rulem.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasAdj
абади<adj>:вечный<adj>
аблā<adj>:глупый<adj>
аблā<adj>:простоватый<adj>
аботā<adj>:глупый<adj>
абох<adj>:бестолковый<adj>
абрадор<adj>:с_пришитой_с_лицевой_стороны_тканью<adj>
абрех̌умин<adj>:шелковый<adj>
вирех̌умин<adj>:шелковый<adj>
абтар<adj>:ленивый<adj>
авда-салā<adj>:семнадцатилетний<adj>
авда-солā<adj>:семнадцатилетний<adj>
аwал-баӡ<adj>:скороспелый<adj>
аwалӣн<adj>:первый<adj>
аwезу̊н<adj>:висячий<adj>
аwеӡу̊н<adj>:висячий<adj>
аwезу̊н<adj>:привязчивый<adj>
аwеӡу̊н<adj>:привязчивый<adj>
аwобаланд<adj>:высокомерный<adj>
аwоздор<adj>:голосистый<adj>
оwоздор<adj>:голосистый<adj>
аwз<adj>:глубокий<adj>
аwӡ<adj>:глубокий<adj>
аwғу̊ни<adj>:афганский<adj>
афғу̊ни<adj>:афганский<adj>
агитāтори<adj>:агитаторский<adj>
агитāтури<adj>:агитаторский<adj>
аграну̊ми<adj>:агрономический<adj>
адаби<adj>:литературный<adj>
аданг<adj>:прямой<adj>
адwодор<adj>:имущий<adj>
адо<adj>:исключительный<adj>
адолатхо<adj>:справедливый<adj>
азӣз<adj>:дорогой<adj>
азолаwу̊н<adj>:всякий<adj>
азорсалā<adj>:тысячелетний<adj>
азорсолā<adj>:тысячелетний<adj>
азор-ҷӯфи<adj>:разный<adj>
азор-ҷӯфи<adj>:очень_хитрый<adj>
айбдор<adj>:виновный<adj>
айби<adj>:с_недостатком<adj>
айодор<adj>:стыдливый<adj>
аййор<adj>:хитрый<adj>
айор<adj>:хитрый<adj>
айоти<adj>:жизненный<adj>
акӣм<adj>:полезный<adj>
акӯмати<adj>:государственный<adj>
укӯмати<adj>:государственный<adj>
алами<adj>:печальный<adj>
алафхор<adj>:травоядный<adj>
алафхур<adj>:травоядный<adj>
алйумӣнин<adj>:алюминиевый<adj>
алумӣнин<adj>:алюминиевый<adj>
аллā<adj>:пегий<adj>
алоw<adj>:крупноузорчатые<adj>
алойид<adj>:отдельный<adj>
алойидā<adj>:отдельный<adj>
алол<adj>:съедобный<adj>
алол<adj>:идущий_впрок<adj>
алол<adj>:честный<adj>
алол<adj>:подходящий<adj>
алолкор<adj>:добросовестный<adj>
алпинӣсти<adj>:альпинистский<adj>
алтой<adj>:ненасытный<adj>
алтой<adj>:ловкий<adj>
алу̊мот<adj>:трудный<adj>
амали<adj>:практический<adj>
аматарафā<adj>:всесторонний<adj>
амбêх̌цин<adj>:арчовый<adj>
амбах̌цин<adj>:арчовый<adj>
амбех̌цин<adj>:арчовый<adj>
анбах̌цин<adj>:арчовый<adj>
амбори<adj>:прочный<adj>
амwазм<adj>:одного_веса<adj>
амwазн<adj>:одного_веса<adj>
амwор<adj>:ровный<adj>
анwор<adj>:ровный<adj>
āмийатдор<adj>:значимый<adj>
амйатдор<adj>:значимый<adj>
амӣр<adj>:щедрый<adj>
амоwоз<adj>:согласный<adj>
амсойаги<adj>:соседний<adj>
амтан<adj>:одинаковой_величины<adj>
амто<adj>:равный<adj>
аму̊мā<adj>:огромный<adj>
аму̊мā<adj>:опухший<adj>
амқад<adj>:одного_роста<adj>
амҷинс<adj>:однородный<adj>
амҷинц<adj>:однородный<adj>
анга<adj>:другой<adj>
йанга<adj>:другой<adj>
ангилӣс<adj>:английский<adj>
ангилӣси<adj>:английский<adj>
ангӯрδин<adj>:виноградный<adj>
андарғамуч<adj>:упрямый<adj>
андêғ<adj>:твердый<adj>
индêғ<adj>:твердый<adj>
аноқ<adj>:ровный<adj>
аноқ<adj>:с_пустыми_руками<adj>
апӯпакилло<adj>:совершенно_голый<adj>
апӯпакило<adj>:совершенно_голый<adj>
араб<adj>:арабский<adj>
араби<adj>:арабский<adj>
арāй-торā<adj>:трехструнный<adj>
арай-торā<adj>:трехструнный<adj>
аракатдор<adj>:энергичный<adj>
арāқин<adj>:потный<adj>
арāқин<adj>:потливый<adj>
арби<adj>:военный<adj>
ар-гӯнā<adj>:разный<adj>
арзандā<adj>:достойный<adj>
арзандā<adj>:догадливый<adj>
арзу̊н<adj>:дешевый<adj>
арзу̊н-боб<adj>:недорогой<adj>
арзу̊н-буо<adj>:недорогой<adj>
арзу̊н-буҳо<adj>:недорогой<adj>
арзун-бао<adj>:недорогой<adj>
арзун-баҳо<adj>:недорогой<adj>
армани<adj>:армянский<adj>
ар-меθā<adj>:ежедневный<adj>
ар-мêстā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ар-моā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ар-мойā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
ар-моҳā<adj>:ежемесячный<adj>
а-рāнг-аθ<adj>:разный<adj>
а-ранг-аθ<adj>:разный<adj>
ар-рāнг-аθ<adj>:разный<adj>
ар-ранг-аθ<adj>:разный<adj>
а-рāнғāҷ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
а-рāнғāҷ-аθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
а-ранғāҷ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
а-ранғāҷ-аθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ар-рāнғāҷ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ар-рāнғāҷ-аθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ар-ранғāҷ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
ар-ранғāҷ-аθ<adj>:всевозможный<adj>
а-рāнгин<adj>:всякий<adj>
а-рангин<adj>:всякий<adj>
ар-рāнгин<adj>:всякий<adj>
ар-рангин<adj>:всякий<adj>
аррӯзā<adj>:ежедневный<adj>
арӯзā<adj>:ежедневный<adj>
артарафā<adj>:всесторонний<adj>
ару̊м<adj>:нечистый<adj>
ару̊мзодā<adj>:незаконнорожденный<adj>
ару̊м-пӯмак<adj>:с_редким_оперением<adj>
ару̊м-пӯнак<adj>:с_редким_оперением<adj>
ару̊м-пӯмак<adj>:лысый<adj>
ару̊м-пӯнак<adj>:лысый<adj>
ар-хелā<adj>:разный<adj>
асал<adj>:сладкий<adj>
асли<adj>:настоящий<adj>
асли<adj>:похожий_на_когол<adj>
аслидор<adj>:благородный<adj>
асоси<adj>:основной<adj>
атапур<adj>:полный<adj>
атми<adj>:необходимый<adj>
афлок<adj>:худой<adj>
афлотӯн<adj>:находчивый<adj>
афтаги<adj>:недельный<adj>
афтайи<adj>:недельный<adj>
афтаги<adj>:еженедельный<adj>
афтайи<adj>:еженедельный<adj>
афтодā<adj>:старый<adj>
афтодсалā<adj>:семидесятилетний<adj>
афтодсолā<adj>:семидесятилетний<adj>
афтодум<adj>:семидесятый<adj>
афранг<adj>:разнообразный<adj>
афтранг<adj>:разнообразный<adj>
афу̊нат<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ахтā<adj>:кастрированный<adj>
ах̌ибнӣнҷ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбну̊нҷ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбу̊нҷ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбӣнҷ<adj>:позавчерашний<adj>
ах̌ибнӣнҷ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбну̊нҷ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбу̊нҷ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
ах̌ӣбӣнҷ<adj>:вчерашний<adj>
аштодсалā<adj>:восьмидесятилетний<adj>
аштодсолā<adj>:восьмидесятилетний<adj>
ағ̌дал<adj>:способный<adj>
ағ̌дар<adj>:способный<adj>
ағ̌дал-мол<adj>:огромный<adj>
ақêқ<adj>:нагой<adj>
ақêқи<adj>:действительный<adj>
ақилā<adj>:трудный<adj>
ақлā<adj>:трудный<adj>
қалā<adj>:трудный<adj>
қелā<adj>:трудный<adj>
ақилā<adj>:трудно<adj>
ақлā<adj>:трудно<adj>
қалā<adj>:трудно<adj>
қелā<adj>:трудно<adj>
ақлидор<adj>:умный<adj>
ақу̊ни<adj>:справедливый<adj>
аққу̊ни<adj>:справедливый<adj>
аҷаб<adj>:удивительный<adj>
аҷинā<adj>:сумасшедший<adj>
аҷойӣб<adj>:интересный<adj>
āзоги<adj>:членский<adj>
āл<adj>:мягкий<adj>
āло<adj>:отличный<adj>
āл-чӯғ̌ҷин<adj>:решенный<adj>
āту̊ми<adj>:атомный<adj>
āх̌к<adj>:говорящий<adj>
ах̌к<adj>:говорящий<adj>
āх̌к<adj>:разговоривый_человек<adj>
ах̌к<adj>:разговоривый_человек<adj>
бāдаб<adj>:вежливый<adj>
бāфзол<adj>:способный<adj>
бāқл<adj>:умный<adj>
бабаракат<adj>:благодатный<adj>
бобаракат<adj>:благодатный<adj>
бобарокат<adj>:благодатный<adj>
ба-wазм<adj>:выдержанный<adj>
ба-wазн<adj>:выдержанный<adj>
ба-wафо<adj>:верный<adj>
ба-wух̌<adj>:сознательный<adj>
ба-ух̌<adj>:сознательный<adj>
ба-wух̌<adj>:в_сознании<adj>
ба-ух̌<adj>:в_сознании<adj>
ба-гандаги<adj>:плохой<adj>
ба-ганди<adj>:плохой<adj>
бад<adj>:плохой<adj>
ба-даwлат<adj>:богатый<adj>
бадам<adj>:сильный<adj>
бадандех̌<adj>:злонамеренный<adj>
бадахлоқ<adj>:дурного_поведения<adj>
бадах̌хи<adj>:бадахшанский<adj>
бадбахт<adj>:несчастный<adj>
бадбахт<adj>:хитрый<adj>
бадбашар<adj>:уродливый<adj>
бадбу̊й<adj>:вонючий<adj>
бадwоймā<adj>:уродливый<adj>
бадгӣр<adj>:строптивая<adj>
бадгиму̊н<adj>:мнительный<adj>
бадгуму̊н<adj>:мнительный<adj>
баддил<adj>:зловредный<adj>
бад-зорδ<adj>:ревнивый<adj>
баӡот<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
бад-лāфч<adj>:с_некрасивыми_губами<adj>
бадмиҷоз<adj>:грубый<adj>
бадму̊милā<adj>:грубый<adj>
бадмӯ̊милā<adj>:грубый<adj>
баднамо<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
баднāфц<adj>:прожорливый<adj>
баднафц<adj>:прожорливый<adj>
бадноз<adj>:кокетливый<adj>
бадну̊м<adj>:имеющий_дурную_славу<adj>
ба-дох̌т<adj>:прочный<adj>
бадрāг<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
бадраг<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
бадрӯй<adj>:с_некрасивым_лицом<adj>
бадсифат<adj>:недоброкачественный<adj>
бадсохт<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
бадсӯрат<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
бадтойифā<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
бадфêл<adj>:норовистый<adj>
бадфêл<adj>:непослушный<adj>
бадфаол<adj>:капризный<adj>
бадфуол<adj>:капризный<adj>
бадхашм<adj>:гневный<adj>
бадхати<adj>:черновой<adj>
бадхур<adj>:отвратительный_на_вкус<adj>
бадху̊н<adj>:слабый<adj>
бадӡоw<adj>:неудобный_для_жатвы<adj>
бадчах̌м<adj>:зловредный<adj>
бадшакли<adj>:безобразный<adj>
бадқāр<adj>:злой<adj>
батқāр<adj>:злой<adj>
бадҷāл<adj>:злобный<adj>
базарб<adj>:сильный<adj>
баздал<adj>:запутанный<adj>
ба-зеб<adj>:красивый<adj>
базӯр<adj>:принудительный<adj>
ба-айбат<adj>:внушительный<adj>
ба-ебат<adj>:внушительный<adj>
ба-йебат<adj>:внушительный<adj>
ба-ибо<adj>:стыдливый<adj>
ба-йибо<adj>:стыдливый<adj>
байнулмилали<adj>:интернациональный<adj>
байнулмиллали<adj>:интернациональный<adj>
байналхалқи<adj>:международный<adj>
байнулхалқи<adj>:международный<adj>
бакал<adj>:годовалая<adj>
бакор<adj>:необходимый<adj>
бакори<adj>:необходимый<adj>
балад<adj>:знакомый<adj>
баламуч<adj>:упитанный<adj>
баланд<adj>:высокий<adj>
билāнд<adj>:высокий<adj>
биланд<adj>:высокий<adj>
баланд<adj>:громкий<adj>
билāнд<adj>:громкий<adj>
биланд<adj>:громкий<adj>
баландпойā<adj>:с_высокими_ножками<adj>
баланпойā<adj>:с_высокими_ножками<adj>
баланд-пох̌нā<adj>:на_высоких_каблуках<adj>
билāнд-пох̌нā<adj>:на_высоких_каблуках<adj>
балан-қāд<adj>:рослый<adj>
балан-қад<adj>:рослый<adj>
баланд-қāд<adj>:рослый<adj>
баланд-қад<adj>:рослый<adj>
билāн-қāд<adj>:рослый<adj>
билāнд-қāд<adj>:рослый<adj>
балан-қу̊мат<adj>:высокий<adj>
баланд-қу̊мат<adj>:высокий<adj>
билāн-қу̊мат<adj>:высокий<adj>
билāнд-қу̊мат<adj>:высокий<adj>
бадҷалӯбат<adj>:страшный<adj>
балаҷӯбат<adj>:страшный<adj>
бало<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
бало<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ба-мазā<adj>:вкусный<adj>
ба-мêр<adj>:добросердечный<adj>
банд<adj>:арестованный<adj>
банд<adj>:загнанный<adj>
баори<adj>:весенний<adj>
бори<adj>:весенний<adj>
буори<adj>:весенний<adj>
баорну̊нҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
баорнӣнч<adj>:весенний<adj>
баору̊нҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
борӣнҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
буорну̊нҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
буорӣнҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
ба-раwах̌<adj>:удобный<adj>
ба-раwих̌<adj>:удобный<adj>
ба-раwах̌<adj>:толковый<adj>
ба-раwих̌<adj>:толковый<adj>
ба-раwах̌-рāнг<adj>:более_или_менее_удобный<adj>
ба-раwих̌-рāнг<adj>:более_или_менее_удобный<adj>
ба-раwах̌-рāнг<adj>:более_или_менее_надежный<adj>
ба-раwих̌-рāнг<adj>:более_или_менее_надежный<adj>
баракатдор<adj>:удачливый<adj>
баракат-йофтā<adj>:удачливый<adj>
бар-алло<adj>:известный<adj>
бараот<adj>:удобный<adj>
бараҳот<adj>:удобный<adj>
бараот<adj>:обеспеченный<adj>
бараҳот<adj>:обеспеченный<adj>
барwахт<adj>:ранний<adj>
барwақт<adj>:ранний<adj>
барwêзи<adj>:барвазский<adj>
бар-дам<adj>:здоровый<adj>
бар-диру̊ғ<adj>:лживый<adj>
бар-дирӯғ<adj>:лживый<adj>
бар-дуру̊ғ<adj>:лживый<adj>
бар-дурӯғ<adj>:лживый<adj>
барзӣнак<adj>:обкрученный<adj>
барзӣнак<adj>:запутанный<adj>
ба-раwоҷ<adj>:допустимый<adj>
ба-риwоҷ<adj>:допустимый<adj>
баробар<adj>:равный<adj>
баробар<adj>:ровный<adj>
барости<adj>:правильный<adj>
бартанги<adj>:бартангский<adj>
бар-тêпчак<adj>:закрученный<adj>
ба-самар<adj>:зрелый<adj>
ба-салêқā<adj>:способный<adj>
ба-силêқā<adj>:способный<adj>
ба-сому̊н<adj>:спокойный<adj>
ба-тартӣб<adj>:аккуратный<adj>
ба-тиғйу̊н<adj>:рослый<adj>
ба-туғйу̊н<adj>:рослый<adj>
ба-фāм<adj>:рассудительный<adj>
ба-фāнд<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ба-фиреб<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ба-фирих̌тā<adj>:спокойный<adj>
бахил<adj>:скупой<adj>
бахмалин<adj>:бархатный<adj>
бахтдор<adj>:счастливый<adj>
бачагу̊на<adj>:детский<adj>
бачадор<adj>:имеющий_детей<adj>
башāнд<adj>:хороший<adj>
башшāнд<adj>:хороший<adj>
башāнд<adj>:хороший<adj>
башшāнд<adj>:хороший<adj>
башāнд<adj>:красивый<adj>
башшāнд<adj>:красивый<adj>
бағӣт<adj>:завистливый<adj>
ба-қуwат<adj>:дюжий<adj>
ба-қуwат<adj>:питательный<adj>
ба-ҷафо<adj>:недоедающий<adj>
бāδ<adj>:зловредный<adj>
бāδ<adj>:бодливый<adj>
бāч-кāчдор<adj>:семейный<adj>
беабри<adj>:безоблачный<adj>
беаwоз<adj>:беззвучный<adj>
беāд<adj>:безграничный<adj>
беад<adj>:безграничный<adj>
беадаб<adj>:невежливый<adj>
беадад<adj>:бесчисленный<adj>
беадолат<adj>:несправедливый<adj>
беайб<adj>:безгрешный<adj>
беамдод<adj>:беззащитный<adj>
беимдод<adj>:беззащитный<adj>
беāмийат<adj>:несущественный<adj>
беамийат<adj>:несущественный<adj>
бе-ангих̌т<adj>:беспалый<adj>
бе-ингах̌т<adj>:беспалый<adj>
бе-андех̌ā<adj>:необдуманный<adj>
беандозā<adj>:безмерный<adj>
беаслиā<adj>:безоружный<adj>
беаслийā<adj>:безоружный<adj>
беасос<adj>:необоснованный<adj>
беатйот<adj>:неосторожный<adj>
беетйот<adj>:неосторожный<adj>
бетйот<adj>:неосторожный<adj>
беāтибор<adj>:не_заслуживающий_доверия<adj>
бебāрā<adj>:не_дающий_плодов<adj>
